Vermont, session 2025-2026, H174.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Binding Arbitration * * *
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 904 is amended to read:
§ 904. SUBJECTS FOR BARGAINING
(a) All matters relating to the relationship between the employer and
employees shall be the subject of collective bargaining except those matters
that are prescribed or controlled by statute. The matters appropriate for
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 2 of 11
collective bargaining to the extent they are not prescribed or controlled by
statute include:
(1) wages, salaries, benefits, and reimbursement practices relating to
necessary expenses and the limits of reimbursable expenses;
(2) minimum hours per week;
(3) working conditions;
(4) overtime compensation and related matters;
(5) leave compensation and related matters;
(6) reduction-in-force procedures;
(7) grievance procedures, including whether an appeal to the Vermont
Labor Relations Board or binding arbitration, or both, will constitute the final
step in a grievance procedure;
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 926 is amended to read:
§ 926. GRIEVANCES
(a) The Board shall hear and make a final determination on the grievances
of all employees who are eligible to appeal grievances to the Board. Grievance
hearings at the Board level shall be conducted in accordance with the rules and
regulations adopted by the Board. The right to institute grievance proceedings
extends to individual employees, groups of employees, and collective
bargaining units.
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 3 of 11
(b) A collective bargaining agreement may provide for binding Binding
arbitration as a shall be the final step of a grievance procedure, rather than a
hearing by the Board. An agreement that includes a binding arbitration
provision Collective bargaining agreements shall also include the procedure
for selecting an arbitrator.
(c) If a collective Collective bargaining agreement provides for binding
arbitration as a final step of a grievance procedure, the agreement agreements
may also establish:
(1) procedural rules for conducting grievance arbitration proceedings;
(2) whether grievance arbitration proceedings will be confidential; and
(3) whether arbitrated grievance determinations will have precedential
value.
(d) An arbitrator chosen or appointed under this section shall have no
authority to add to, subtract from, or modify the collective bargaining
agreement.
(e) Any collective Collective bargaining agreement that contains a binding
arbitration provision pursuant to this section agreements shall include an
acknowledgement of arbitration that provides substantially the following:
ACKNOWLEDGEMENT OF ARBITRATION
(The parties) understand that this agreement contains a provision for binding
arbitration as a final step of the grievance process. After the effective date of
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 4 of 11
this agreement, no grievance, submitted to binding arbitration, may be brought
to the Vermont Labor Relations Board. An employee who has declined
representation by the employee organization or whom the employee
organization has declined to represent or is unable to represent, shall be
entitled, either by representing himself or herself or with the assistance of
independent legal counsel, to appeal his or her grievance to the Vermont Labor
Relations Board as the final step of the grievance process in accordance with
the rules and regulations adopted by the Board.
(f) This section shall not apply to labor interest arbitration, which as used in
this chapter means the method of concluding labor negotiations by means of a
disinterested person to determine the terms of a labor agreement.
(g) A party may apply to the arbitrator for a modification of an award if the
application is made within 30 days after delivery of a copy of the award to the
applicant. An arbitrator may modify an award only if the arbitrator finds any
one of the following:
(1) There was an evident miscalculation of figures or an evident mistake
in the description of any person, thing, or property referred to in the award.
(2) The award was based on a matter not submitted to the arbitrator, and
the award may be corrected without affecting the merits of the decision on the
issues submitted.
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 5 of 11
(3) The award was imperfect in form and the award may be corrected
without affecting the merits of the controversy.
(h) A party may apply to the Civil Division of the Superior Court for
review of the award provided the application is made within 30 days after
delivery of a copy of the award to the applicant or, in the case of a claim of
corruption, fraud, or other undue means, the application is made within 30 days
after those grounds are known or should have been known. The Civil Division
of the Superior Court shall vacate an arbitration award based on any of the
following:
(1) The award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means.
(2) There was partiality or prejudicial misconduct by the arbitrator.
(3) The arbitrator exceeded his or her the arbitrator’s power or rendered
an award requiring a person to commit an act or engage in conduct prohibited
by law.
(i) The Board shall hear and make a final determination on the The
grievances of all retired individual employees of the University of Vermont,
groups of such retired individuals, and retired collective bargaining unit
members of the University of Vermont shall be submitted to binding
arbitration for a final determination. Grievances shall be limited to those
relating to compensation and benefits that were accrued during active
employment but are received after retirement. As used in this subsection,
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 6 of 11
“grievance” means an allegation of a violation of a collective bargaining
agreement, employee handbook provision, early retirement plan, individual
separation agreement or other documented agreement, or rule or regulation of
the University of Vermont.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 928 is amended to read:
§ 928. RULES
(a) The Board, as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, shall
adopt and may amend and rescind rules consistent with this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, rules
adopted by the Board as they relate to grievance appeals shall provide:
(1) If a collective bargaining agreement provides that an appeal to the
Board will constitute the final step in the grievance procedure, all employees
and other persons authorized by this chapter shall have the right to appeal to
the Board in accordance with the rules of the Board.
(2) That a reasonable notice be given to the State agency or officer, and
State employee, and the representative concerned and to the Commissioner of
Human Resources.
(3) That all hearings of the Board shall be public and, unless both parties
concerned request that it be formal, hearings shall be informal and not subject
to the rules of pleadings, procedure, and evidence of the courts of the State.
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 7 of 11
(4) That all parties in interest to any appeal shall be entitled to be heard
on any matter at issue.
(5) That in appeals from the decisions of the Department of Human
Resources or any State agency or officer, the State agency and officer and the
State employee shall be parties in interest, and the Commissioner of Human
Resources or the collective bargaining representative on motion, may intervene
as a party in interest.
(6) That the parties at interest shall have the right to present witnesses,
give evidence, and examine witnesses before the Board.
(7)(A)(i) That the name of any grievant whom the Board exonerates of
misconduct for which he or she was disciplined shall be redacted from the
version of the Board’s decision that is posted on the Board’s website.
(ii) Nothing in this subdivision (7)(A) shall be construed to require
the Board to redact the name of the grievant from any other version of the
Board’s decision or from any other documents related to the grievance.
(B) Nothing in this subdivision (7) shall be construed to modify an
individual’s right to privacy pursuant to any law, rule, or policy.
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 8 of 11
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. UNIT DETERMINATION, CERTIFICATION, AND
REPRESENTATION
* * *
(i) The Board, by rule, shall prescribe a uniform procedure for the
resolution of employee grievances submitted through the collective bargaining
machinery. If the collective bargaining agreement does not provide that
binding arbitration will be the final step of the negotiated grievance procedure
pursuant to section 926 of this chapter, the final step of the negotiated
grievance procedure, if required, shall be a hearing and final determination by
the Board. Grievance hearings conducted by the Board shall be informal and
not subject to the rules of pleading procedure, and evidence of the courts of the
State. Any employee or group of employees included in a duly certified
bargaining unit may be represented before the Board by its bargaining
representative’s counsel or designated executive staff employees or by any
individual the Board may permit at its discretion. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 1001 is amended to read:
§ 1001. GRIEVANCES; APPLICANTS AND EXCLUDED PERSONNEL
* * *
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 9 of 11
(c) Any dispute concerning the amount of a collective bargaining service
fee may be grieved as set forth in the collective bargaining agreement through
either an appeal to the Vermont Labor Relations Board in accordance with the
Board’s rules concerning grievances, or through binding arbitration.
* * * Unfair Labor Practices * * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 965 is amended to read:
§ 965. PREVENTION OF UNFAIR PRACTICES
(a) The Board may prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor
practice listed in sections 961–962 of this title. Whenever a charge is made
that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any unfair labor practice, the
Board may issue and cause to be served upon that person a complaint stating
the charges in that respect and containing a notice of hearing before the Board
at a place and time therein fixed at least seven business days after the
complaint is served. The Board may amend the complaint at any time before it
issues an order based thereon on the complaint. No complaint shall issue
based on any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months prior to the
filing of the charge with the Board and the service of a copy thereof of the
charge upon the person against whom such charge is made, unless the person
aggrieved thereby individual filing the charge was prevented from filing the
charge doing so by reason of service in the U.S. Armed Forces, in which event
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 10 of 11
the six-month period shall be computed from the day of his or her the
individual’s discharge.
(b) The person complained of shall have the right to file an answer to the
original or amended complaint and appear in person or otherwise and present
evidence in connection therewith with the complaint at the time and place
fixed in the complaint by the Board. In the discretion of the Board, any other
person may be permitted to intervene and present evidence in the matter. Any
proceeding under this section shall, so far as practicable, be conducted in
accordance with Rules of Evidence used in the courts. The Board shall
provide for the making of a transcript of the testimony presented at the hearing.
* * *
(f) No order of the Board shall require the reinstatement of any individual
as an employee who has been suspended or discharged or the payment to him
or her the individual of any back pay, if such the individual was suspended or
discharged for cause, except through the grievance procedures.
(g) The following timelines shall apply to charges brought under this
section:
(1) The party against whom an unfair labor practice charge is filed shall
file the answer not later than 14 days after receipt of service of the complaint.
(2) The Board shall hold a hearing on the unfair labor practice charge
not later than 90 days after the date upon which the answer is filed, absent
VT LEG #379953 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.174
2025 Page 11 of 11
extenuating circumstances. If extenuating circumstances require additional
time before a hearing is held, the Board shall promptly notify the parties of the
reason for the extension and set a new date and time for the hearing.
(3) Post-hearing briefs, if any, shall be filed not later than 14 days after
the hearing.
(4) The Board shall issue its decision on the unfair labor practice charge
not later than 30 days after the hearing or after receipt of the parties’ post-
hearing briefs, whichever is later.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379953 v.1